Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 6
CONSOLIDATION

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

onsolidation of Fire Protection Districts: A

C

ase Study", see 24 Colo. Law. 813 (1995).

32-1-601. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Concurring resolution" means a resolution passed in accordance with this part 6 by the board of any special district for the purpose of accepting the consolidation resolution.

"Consolidated district" means a quasi-municipal corporation of this state resulting from the consolidation of two or more special districts; or resulting from the consolidation of one or more of the services of two or more special districts, one of which is not a metropolitan district, which consolidation of services may include the consolidation of all services of a special district with only specified services of one or more special districts; or resulting from the consolidation of one or more of the services of two or more metropolitan districts and may include the consolidation of all services of a metropolitan district with only specified services of another metropolitan district. If a district which provides a single service or water and sanitation services consolidates its service or services with another single service district, no new separate district may be formed.

"Consolidation resolution" means a resolution passed in accordance with this part 6 by a board of any special district for the purpose of initiating the consolidation of two or more such special districts into a single and consolidated district, the consolidation of one or more of the services of two or more special districts, one of which is not a metropolitan district, or the consolidation of one or more of the services of two or more metropolitan districts.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1563, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1111, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-112 (2) to (4) as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-602. Procedure for consolidation.

Two or more special districts may be consolidated into a single consolidated district, and such consolidation may occur between or among such districts whether or not they were originally organized for the same purpose and whether or not such districts are contiguous.

Two or more special districts may consolidate one or more of their services whether or not they were originally organized for the same purpose and whether or not such districts are contiguous.

Consolidation may be accomplished in the following manner:

The board of any special district shall pass a consolidation resolution declaring that such district and any specified special district or districts are so situated that all such districts may operate or that one or more specified services of each of the districts may be operated effectively and economically as a consolidated district and that the public health, safety, prosperity, and general welfare of the inhabitants of the special district initiating the consolidation will be better served by the consolidation of such districts or services. The resolution shall also state the proposed name of the proposed consolidated district, the special districts or services to be included within the proposed consolidated district, whether the board of the consolidated district will have five or seven directors, any special conditions that may attach to the consolidated district, and the time limit within which the included special districts must approve the consolidation resolution in order to be included within the proposed consolidated district. Such time limit shall be not later than six months after the date of such resolution.

After receipt of such consolidation resolution and prior to the time limit fixed in the consolidation resolution, the board of each of the special districts named in the resolution proposing the consolidation, other than the special district initiating the proposed consolidation, shall pass a resolution either concurring in the consolidation or rejecting the same and shall send a copy of such resolution to the special district initiating the consolidation.

Each special district desiring to be included or have its service or services included within the consolidated district shall file the concurring resolution with the initiating special district. If one or more special districts sought to be included in the initiating resolution file concurring resolutions stating that such consolidated district will promote the public health, safety, prosperity, and general welfare of the inhabitants within the concurring special districts, the initiating special district, within thirty days after the date of the receipt of all concurring resolutions, shall file with the board of county commissioners of each county having territory within one or more of the districts and in the court wherein the organization petition of the initiating special district was filed a copy of such consolidation resolution and the concurring resolutions of the other special districts seeking consolidation of the districts or the specified services. Any proposed consolidated district which is subject to the provisions of part 2 of this article pursuant to section 32-1-607 (6) shall first obtain approval of the service plan in accordance with the provisions of part 2 of this article. Any special district rejecting the consolidation resolution shall not thereafter be included in any consolidation proceedings then pending.

When the consolidation resolution and one or more concurring resolutions are filed in court, the court shall fix a date, not less than thirty days nor more than forty days after the date of filing, within which time a hearing shall be held to determine the legality of the proposed consolidation. Notice of the filing of the resolutions and of the date fixed for hearing objections to the proposed consolidation shall be given by publication, and written notice shall be provided to the governing body of any municipality entitled to notice pursuant to section 32-1-607 (6). No pleadings shall be filed by any special district involved, but any eligible elector of, the fee owner of any real property situated within, or any county or municipality having territory within any of the special districts involved in the proposed consolidation which desires to oppose the consolidation or the inclusion of property or territory in a consolidated district shall file a written and verified petition in the court five days prior to the hearing date and serve copies thereof upon each of the special districts desiring consolidation. The petition shall set forth clearly and concisely the objections of the petitioner, which objections shall be limited to the failure of any initiating district or concurring district to comply with this part 6, or, in a consolidation of services proceeding, duplication of service to the petitioner's property or territory by an existing municipality or special district not part of the proposed consolidated district or the provision of new and unwanted service to the petitioner's property by the proposed consolidated district. The court shall hear the petition and all objections to it at the time of the hearing on the consolidation resolution and the concurring resolutions and shall determine whether, in the general public interest and subject to the requirements of section 32-1-503, the property should be excluded or included in the proposed consolidated district.

At the hearing, if the court finds that the consolidation resolution and the concurring resolutions have been properly filed and that the board of each special district desiring to be consolidated or desiring to have specified services consolidated has proceeded in accordance with this part 6, the court shall enter an order ex parte setting an election within each of the consolidating special districts for the approval of the consolidated district by the eligible electors affected by the consolidation at the next regular special district or special election, which shall be held and conducted pursuant to article 13.5 of title 1. The order shall require publication of notice as required by section 1-13.5-510, specifying the name of the consolidated district; the names of the special districts to be consolidated or the name of the district into which specific services are to be consolidated and the names of the special districts presently empowered to provide the services; a summary of any special conditions that may attach to the consolidated district, including any preconsolidation agreements and the provisions included therein regarding the assumption of debt and the approval of any financial obligation, including accrued unfunded pension liability, as debt to remain payable by the taxpayers of the consolidating special district which incurred the obligation or maintained the pension plan to which the accrued unfunded liability attaches; if the consolidated district may be granted the powers of a metropolitan district, the effect of the change and the services a metropolitan district may provide, including any change in maximum mill levies set forth in section 32-1-1101 (1), or, if the mill levy is unlimited, the fact that there is no mill levy limit established by statute; and the area to be included within the consolidated district, which shall be all of the area originally contained within the organization order for each individual special district, together with all areas contained in any inclusions, the consolidated area not to include any area excluded by any special district being so consolidated or by the court pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section. If two or more districts are to be consolidated and if the consolidated district is to assume metropolitan district powers, the court shall order that the eligible electors vote separately on the question of consolidation and the question of granting the consolidated district the powers of a metropolitan district. If the eligible electors approve consolidation but reject the granting of metropolitan district powers, the consolidated district shall have only those powers granted single-purpose districts providing the same services. If all or part of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of all of the consolidating special districts is to be assumed by the consolidated district, the court shall also order that the eligible electors vote separately on the question of consolidation and the question of assuming the indebtedness at the consolidation election. If the eligible electors approve consolidation but reject the assumption of indebtedness by the consolidated district, the outstanding bonded indebtedness shall remain the obligation of the special district which incurred the bonded indebtedness and shall be paid and discharged by the taxpayers having taxable property within the boundaries of the indebted special district. If a preconsolidation agreement provides that the consolidation shall be contingent upon assumption of debt by the consolidated district, then the consolidation shall not be approved unless the assumption of indebtedness is approved by the eligible electors. If any financial obligation of one or more of the consolidating districts is to be submitted to the electors for approval as debt, the court shall also order that the electors vote separately on the question of consolidation and the question of approval of each financial obligation as debt, which issue shall be presented to the electors in accordance with section 32-1-606.5. If the electors approve consolidation but do not approve the treatment of one or more financial obligations as debt, the financial obligations not so approved shall be assumed by the consolidated district in the same manner as other obligations of consolidating districts are assumed, unless a preconsolidation agreement providing that the consolidation shall be contingent upon the approval regarding treatment of the financial obligation as debt, in which case the consolidation shall not be approved. The area of the consolidated district after the election shall be the total area of the special districts consolidated existing as of the date of the court order. No appeal shall lie from any orders of the court.

Approval by a majority of the eligible electors voting in the election within each of the consolidating special districts concerning the consolidation of the special districts or specified services shall be deemed to conclusively establish the consolidated district against all persons except the state of Colorado which, within thirty-five days after the election, may contest the consolidation or the election in an action in the nature of a writ of quo warranto. Otherwise, the consolidation of the districts or services and the organization of the consolidated district shall not directly or indirectly be questioned in any action or proceeding.

Any proceeding for consolidation undertaken pursuant to this section which is not approved shall not operate as a bar to any subsequently proposed consolidation of one or more of the special districts or services named in the consolidation resolution with any other special district or with each other. The provisions of section 32-1-106 shall not apply to any subsequently proposed consolidation.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1563, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1), (2)(a), (2)(c) to (2)(f), and (3) amended, p. 1112, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2)(d) to (2)(f) amended, p. 878, § 112, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2)(e) amended, p. 562, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2012:

(2)(f) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 881, § 147, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2)(e) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 786, § 85, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(2)(e) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 541, § 12, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-113 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-602.5. Consolidation and review by administrative action.

Whenever the division finds, upon its own investigation or upon the receipt of information from any source, that the consolidation, restructuring of services, or other changes in the operations of one or more special districts would be in the best interests of the residents of the special districts or will improve the quality of services or lower the costs of services, the division may review the operations and performance of such special districts and issue recommendations. The division may require one or more special district boards to hold a public meeting to discuss the operations and performance of such special districts. If such public meeting involves two special district boards and both boards agree that consolidation is appropriate, they shall commence consolidation procedures pursuant to section 32-1-602. If the public meeting involves three or more special district boards, a majority of such boards must approve consolidation before consolidation procedures are commenced.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 787, § 13, effective June 4.

32-1-603. Procedure after consolidation election.

After the election approving the consolidated district, the members of the board of each of the special districts consolidated or having services consolidated into the consolidated district shall constitute the organizational board of the consolidated district, regardless of the number of directors thereof. This organizational board shall remain as the board of the consolidated district until such time as the first board of the consolidated district is selected as provided in this section.

The organizational board, within six months after the date of the consolidation election, shall:

If the board of the consolidated district is to have five directors, determine the terms of the directors of the first board as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2); or

If the board of the consolidated district is to have seven directors, divide the consolidated district into seven director districts, each of which shall have, as nearly as possible, the same number of eligible electors and which shall be as contiguous and compact as possible, and determine the terms of the directors of the first board as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2). In making the division, the board shall consider existing or potential developments within the proposed director districts which when completed would, in the reasonably near future, increase or decrease the number of eligible electors within the director district. The organizational board shall then select from its members a representative of each director district, and, if possible, the representatives shall be eligible electors within the boundaries of the director district which they are selected to represent. Thereafter, directors shall be eligible electors of the director district which they represent.

Determine the terms of the directors of the first board of the consolidated district. In making the determination, the organizational board shall fix the terms of the first board as follows: The terms of two directors, if there are five directors, or three directors, if there are seven directors, of the first board having the fewest years to serve on the board to which they were originally elected shall expire at the first regular special district election after the date of order of the court as provided in subsection (4) of this section; and the terms of the remaining three directors, if there are five directors, or the remaining four directors, if there are seven directors, having the greatest number of years to serve on the board to which they were originally elected shall expire at the second regular special district election. If the terms of the directors so selected to the first board of the consolidated district expire on the same date, the terms of the directors shall be determined by the organizational board. The terms shall be determined, however, so that two or three directors, as applicable, shall have terms expiring in two years and three or four directors, as applicable, shall have terms expiring in four years. Thereafter, each board member shall have a term of four years.

Determine the amount of bond for each director of the consolidated district, which amount shall not be less than one thousand dollars per director and may be an individual, schedule or blanket bond at the expense of the consolidated district, and fix the amount of the treasurer's bond in an amount not less than five thousand dollars, which bonds are conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties.

After making such determinations, the organizational board shall promptly file in the court having jurisdiction as provided in section 32-1-602 (2)(c) a petition stating the name of the consolidated district, the name and address of each member of the first board of the consolidated district, the term of each member thereof, the amount of the surety bonds fixed in accordance with this section, and a description of the director districts, if any, of the consolidated district. Such petition shall also have attached to it photocopies or duplicates of the bonds duly certified by the insurance or surety company issuing the bonds, the originals of which bonds shall be retained in the files of the consolidated district.

The court, upon the filing of such petition, if satisfied that the allegations therein are true, shall enter an order ex parte stating the name of the consolidated district, the name and address of each member of the first board of the consolidated district, a description of the director districts, if any, of the consolidated district, a description of the total consolidated district, any conditions that may attach to the consolidated district if services are consolidated, a description of the specified services to be provided by such district, and the term of office of each member of the board of the consolidated district, and, at the same time, the court shall approve or disapprove the bond or bonds attached to the petition. This order shall be forthwith recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder in each county wherein the consolidated district is organized, and notice of such action shall be given in accordance with the provisions of section 32-1-105.

The members of the first board named in the order of court as provided in subsection (4) of this section, upon taking the oath of office, shall constitute the board of the consolidated district. The board shall elect one of its members as chairman of the board and president of the consolidated district, one of its members as treasurer of the board and the consolidated district, and a secretary of the board and the consolidated district who may be a member of the board. The secretary and the treasurer may be one person, but, if such is the case, he shall be a member of the board.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1565, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 1115, § 3, effective July 1; (2)(a)(II), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1084, § 3, effective July 1, 1986.

L. 92:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 880, § 113, effective January 1, 1993.

32-1-604. Advisory board members.

The members of the organizational board of the consolidated district not selected to act as the members of the first board of the consolidated district may act, however, as advisory members to the first board until such time as the terms of office for which they were originally elected would have expired. Advisory members may be compensated equally with compensation paid to the board of the consolidated district for each meeting attended. Advisory board members may not act as officers of nor bind the consolidated district and shall have no vote on any matters before the board of the consolidated district, but they may be employed by the board of the consolidated district in any capacity.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1566, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-115 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-605. Special election provisions for consolidated districts.

The first election of the consolidated district shall be the next regular special district election. Except as otherwise provided in this part 6, nominations and elections for the consolidated district shall be governed by articles 4 and 13.5 of title 1, C.R.S.

For those consolidated districts having seven directors on the board, beginning with the first regular special district election and continuing with each regular special district election thereafter, members of the consolidated board shall be eligible electors of the director district which they represent. Nominations for a director shall be signed by eligible electors from the director district which the director to be elected is to represent.

After the first regular special district election of directors to the board in such consolidated districts, the board of the consolidated district, at least ninety days prior to any subsequent regular special district election, shall determine the boundaries of each director district pursuant to section 32-1-603 (2) and shall not make any change until after the regular special district election has been held. Upon making any change in the boundaries of any director district, the board, within ninety days prior to a regular special district election, shall file a resolution changing the boundaries with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction and shall give notice by one publication within the consolidated district.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1566, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1084, § 4, effective July 1, 1986.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 880, § 114, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 787, § 86, effective June 6.

32-1-606. Bonded indebtedness of consolidated districts.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section and approved by the eligible electors pursuant to section 32-1-602 (2)(e), all of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of any special district which becomes part of a consolidated district or which has all of its services completely consolidated shall be paid and discharged by the taxpayers having taxable property within the boundaries of the special district which incurred the bonded indebtedness. The board of the consolidated district shall levy a general property tax annually, for so long as may be necessary to pay the bonded indebtedness according to its terms, upon the properties lying within the boundaries of the special district which incurred the bonded indebtedness as the boundaries existed when the special district became a part of the consolidated district. The levying of the tax shall not prevent the board of the consolidated district from imposing special rates, tolls, or charges for services and facilities afforded within the boundaries of the indebted special district or made available to the properties lying within the indebted special district.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section and approved by the eligible electors pursuant to section 32-1-602 (2)(e), all of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of any special district which consolidates less than all of its services into a consolidated district shall remain the obligation of the special district which incurred the bonded indebtedness and shall be paid and discharged by the taxpayers having taxable property within the boundaries of the indebted special district. The board of the special district which incurred the bonded indebtedness shall levy a general property tax annually, for so long as may be necessary to pay the bonded indebtedness according to its terms, upon the properties lying within the boundaries of the indebted special district. The levying of the tax shall not prevent the board of the consolidated district from imposing special rates, tolls, or charges for services and facilities afforded within the boundaries of the indebted special district or made available to the properties lying within the indebted special district.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a consolidated district from being bound by preconsolidation agreements which have been entered into between or among consolidating districts and which have become part of the terms and conditions of consolidation as set forth in the court order under section 32-1-603 (4), including the assumption of all or part of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of all of the consolidating special districts by the consolidated special district.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1567, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1115, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 881, § 115, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-117 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-606.5. Elector approval of financial obligations of consolidating districts.

Whenever the board of a consolidating special district determines, by resolution, that the interest of the special district, the resulting consolidated district, and the public interest require that the obligation to pay and discharge any financial obligation, including accrued unfunded pension liability, remain the obligation of the taxpayers of said consolidating special district, the board shall request that the court order the submission of the proposition of treating the financial obligation as general obligation indebtedness to the electors of said consolidating district at the consolidation election. Such request shall be made to the court at the hearing held in accordance with section 32-1-602 (2)(e) and shall recite, as to each financial obligation to be submitted at the election:

The object and purpose for which the financial obligation was incurred or the pension plan to which the accrued unfunded liability attaches;

The estimated total cost of discharging the financial obligation;

The estimated term over which the financial obligation will be discharged and the estimated annual cost;

The initial mill levy necessary to pay the annual cost; and

Whether the consolidation is contingent upon approval of the financial obligation as debt.

If the court finds that the board's request complies with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the court shall grant the board's request and include in its order entered pursuant to section 32-1-602 (2)(e), that the electors of the consolidating special district vote separately on each financial obligation proposed to be treated as debt.

If approved as debt by the electors at the consolidation election, the financial obligation of the consolidating special district, which becomes part of a consolidated district, shall be paid and discharged by the taxpayers having taxable property within the boundaries of the consolidating special district which incurred the obligation or maintained the pension plan to which the accrued unfunded liability attaches. The board of the consolidated district shall levy a general property tax annually for so long as may be necessary to retire the elector-approved debt.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a consolidated district from being bound by preconsolidation agreements which have been entered into between or among consolidating districts and which have become part of the terms and conditions of consolidation as set forth in the court order under section 32-1-603 (4) including the assumption of any or all of the financial obligations of the consolidating special districts by the consolidated special district.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 563, § 2, effective April 30.

32-1-607. Powers.

Subject to the provisions of section 32-1-602 (2)(e), a consolidated district has all of the rights, powers, and authorities which were granted by statute to each of the special districts which are consolidated and may have the rights, powers, and authorities granted to a metropolitan district. Any consolidated district which embraces any special district is not limited in its exercise of the rights, powers, and authorities granted in this section because the full extent of the purposes and powers to be exercised by the consolidated district was not stated or was stated otherwise in any organization petition, court order, or ballot of any one or more of the special districts so consolidated, but a consolidated district established on or after July 1, 1985, is limited in its exercise of the rights, powers, and authorities granted or validated in this section to the extent the purposes and powers to be exercised by the consolidated district are stated in the consolidation resolution or subsequently approved by a vote of the eligible electors of the consolidated district.

The consolidated district, upon order of the court as provided in section 32-1-603 (4), shall immediately become the owner of and entitled to receive, hold, sue for, and collect all moneys, funds, taxes, levies, assessments, fees, and charges and all property and assets of any kind or nature owned, leased, or claimed by or due to any of the special districts so consolidated. The obligations of the special districts, other than bonded indebtedness and elector-approved debt, shall be assumed by the consolidated district and paid by the consolidated district. Inclusions and exclusions of lands to and from the consolidated district shall be governed by the provisions of parts 4 and 5 of this article.

In the case of a district into which services are consolidated, the district shall have all of the rights, powers, and authorities which are granted by statute for each of the consolidated services. Unless all of the rights, powers, and authorities of a metropolitan district are granted pursuant to section 32-1-602 (2)(e), if the consolidated district is authorized to provide two or more of the services specified in section 32-1-1004 (2), the consolidated district shall have only those rights, powers, and authorities granted and shall be subject to the limitations applicable to other single-purpose special districts providing a similar service. Any consolidated district which embraces any special district is not limited in its exercise of the rights, powers, and authorities granted in this section because the full extent of the purposes and powers to be exercised by the consolidated district was not stated or was stated otherwise in any organization petition, court order, or ballot of any one or more of the special districts so consolidated, but the consolidated district is limited in its exercise of the rights, powers, and authorities granted or validated in this section to the extent the purposes and powers to be exercised are stated in the consolidated resolution or subsequently approved by a vote of the eligible electors of the consolidated district.

A consolidated district, upon order of the court as provided in section 32-1-603 (4), shall immediately become the owner of and entitled to receive, hold, sue for, and collect all moneys, funds, levies, assessments, fees, and charges and all properties and assets of any kind or nature owned, leased, or claimed by or due to any of the special districts so consolidated for the services consolidated, subject to the terms of a preconsolidation agreement, contract, or bond covenant affecting the conveyance. The obligations of the special districts for the services consolidated, other than bonded indebtedness and elector-approved debt, shall be assumed by the consolidated district and paid by the district. Inclusions and exclusions of lands to and from the consolidated district shall be governed by the provisions of parts 4 and 5 of this article.

Except as provided in this part 6, any special district which consolidates less than all of its services into a consolidated district may remain in existence and not be affected by the consolidation proceeding or may, on motion of the board after notice to the court and after providing for the payment of any outstanding indebtedness, be dissolved. If the special district remains in existence, such special district shall no longer possess the power to provide the services so consolidated. If such special district is authorized to provide only a single remaining service, it shall have only those rights, powers, and authorities granted and shall be subject to the limitations applicable to other single-purpose special districts providing a similar service.

No consolidation proceeding under this part 6 is subject to the provisions of part 2 of this article; except that any consolidation proceeding under this part 6 that will result in the creation of a consolidated district that will provide new or different services within the boundaries of any existing municipality as compared to the services that are either being provided or that are authorized to be provided to the municipality by one or more of the consolidating special districts as of the commencement of the consolidation proceedings subjects the proposed consolidated district to the provisions of part 2 of this article. In such event, the provisions of part 2 of this article relating to the organization of a proposed special district must be complied with by the special district initiating the consolidation after adoption of the consolidation resolution and concurring resolutions but prior to filing such resolutions with the court as specified in section 32-1-602 (2)(c); except that the provisions of section 32-1-203 (2)(b) are not applicable when existing service is being provided by a consolidating special district. Any such municipality is an interested party and entitled to notice of the proceedings for all of the purposes provided in part 2 of this article and in this part 6. If the board of either the initiating special district or a concurring special district disapproves the final action taken on such service plan, the consolidation proceeding must be terminated.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1567, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended and (3) to (6) added, p. 1116, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 882, § 116, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 565, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (HB 13-1302), ch. 317, p. 1733, § 1, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-118 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-608. Subsequent consolidations.

Any consolidated district may initiate proceedings for the consolidation of one consolidated district with another special district, whether or not a consolidated district, as provided in section 32-1-602. Such proceedings shall proceed in accordance with this part 6 without regard to the fact that the districts have been previously consolidated.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1567, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-120 as it existed prior to 1981.